Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-912
Budget; income from taxation; deemed appropriated.

The funds to be raised by taxation or otherwise, as provided and allowed in said budget, for the various offices, departments, activities, and funds of the county shall, upon the adoption of the budget, be deemed to be and be appropriated to the various offices, departments, activities, and funds as provided in said budget, and shall be used for no other purpose.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 7, p. 228;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 5, p. 130;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2107;

R.S.1943, § 23-912.